Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.915

Effective date—2006 c 54.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5435.SL) ***

Sections 1 through 5 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [March 15, 2006].

[ 2006 c 54 s 13.]